Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.022

"Manager"—Definition.

For purposes of this chapter, "manager" means any employee who:

(1) Formulates statewide policy or directs the work of an agency or agency subdivision;

(2) Is responsible to administer one or more statewide policies or programs of an agency or agency subdivision;

(3) Manages, administers, and controls a local branch office of an agency or agency subdivision, including the physical, financial, or personnel resources;

(4) Has substantial responsibility in personnel administration, legislative relations, public information, or the preparation and administration of budgets; or

(5) Functionally is above the first level of supervision and exercises authority that is not merely routine or clerical in nature and requires the consistent use of independent judgment.

Members of the Washington management service may be included in a collective bargaining unit established under chapter 41.80 RCW, except as provided in RCW 41.80.430.

[ 2023 c 136 s 1; 2002 c 354 s 207; 1993 c 281 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 136: See note following RCW 41.80.430.

Short title—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907.

Effective date—1993 c 281: "Sections 1 through 66 and 68 through 71 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 281 s 74.]